trunk/apertium-br-fr/apertium-br-fr.br.dix
    <pardef n="/bezañ__vbloc">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emaon</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>’maon</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emaout</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>’maout</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emañ</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ema</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>’mañ</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>	
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emaomp</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>’maomp</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>	 
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emaoc’h</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>’maoc’h</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>	  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emaint</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>’maint</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>	  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emeur</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pri"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>’meur</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pri"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>edon</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>edos</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>edo</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>edomp</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>edoc’h</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>edont</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emod</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pii"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>emedon</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>emedos</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>emedo</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>emedomp</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>emedoc’h</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>emedont</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ememod</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pii"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>emeden</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>emedes</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>emede</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>emedemp</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>emedec’h</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>emedent</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ememed</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pii"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>eden</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>edes</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ede</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>edemp</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>edec’h</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>edent</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>emed</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vbloc"/><s n="pii"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="bezañ"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/></e>
    <e lm="bezañ o tihan" r="LR"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>o<b/>tihan</l><r><g><b/>o<b/>tihan</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ abaoe"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>abaoe</l><r><g><b/>abaoe</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ e soñj"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>e<b/>soñj</l><r><g><b/>e<b/>soñj</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ anv da" r="LR"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>anv<b/>da</l><r><g><b/>anv<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ anv da" r="LR"><p><l>anv<b/></l><r/></p><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>da</l><r><g><b/>anv<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ bet darbet da" r="RL"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>bet<b/>darbet<b/><a/>da</l><r><g><b/>bet<b/>darbet<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ bet darbet da" r="LR"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>bet<b/>darbet<b/>d’</l><r><g><b/>bet<b/>darbet<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ bet darbet da" r="LR"><p><l>bet<b/>darbet<b/></l><r/></p><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>d’</l><r><g><b/>bet<b/>darbet<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ boas da" r="RL"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>boas<b/><a/>da</l><r><g><b/>boas<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ boas da" r="LR"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>boas<b/>d’</l><r><g><b/>boas<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ boas da" r="LR"><p><l>boas<b/></l><r/></p><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>d’</l><r><g><b/>boas<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ danvez da" r="LR"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>danvez<b/>da</l><r><g><b/>danvez<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ danvez da" r="LR"><p><l>danvez<b/></l><r/></p><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>da</l><r><g><b/>danvez<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ en oad da" r="RL"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>en<b/>oad<b/><a/>da</l><r><g><b/>en<b/>oad<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ en oad da" r="LR"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>en<b/>oad<b/>d’</l><r><g><b/>en<b/>oad<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ en oad da" r="LR"><p><l>en oad<b/></l><r/></p><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>d’</l><r><g><b/>en<b/>oad<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ plijet gant"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>plijet<b/>gan</l><r><g><b/>plijet<b/>gan</g></r></p><par n="gan/t__pr_vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bezañ en a-raok"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>en<b/>a-raok</l><r><g><b/>en<b/>a-raok</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ gouest da" r="RL"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>gouest<b/><a/>da</l><r><g><b/>gouest<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ gouest da" r="LR"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>gouest<b/>d’</l><r><g><b/>gouest<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ gouest da" r="LR"><p><l>gouest<b/></l><r/></p><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>d’</l><r><g><b/>gouest<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ gwir"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>gwir</l><r><g><b/>gwir</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ kounnaret"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>kounnaret</l><r><g><b/>kounnaret</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ kustum da" r="RL"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>kustum<b/><a/>da</l><r><g><b/>kustum<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ kustum da" r="LR"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>kustum<b/>d’</l><r><g><b/>kustum<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ kustum da" r="LR"><p><l>kustum<b/></l><r/></p><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>d’</l><r><g><b/>kustum<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ kontant da" r="RL"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>kontant<b/><a/>da</l><r><g><b/>kontant<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ kontant da" r="LR"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>kontant<b/>d’</l><r><g><b/>kontant<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ kontant da" r="LR"><p><l>kontant<b/></l><r/></p><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>d’</l><r><g><b/>kontant<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ krog da" r="LR"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>krog<b/>da</l><r><g><b/>krog<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ krog da" r="LR"><p><l>krog<b/></l><r/></p><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>da</l><r><g><b/>krog<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ ouzh e ober"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>ouzh<b/>e<b/>ober</l><r><g><b/>ouzh<b/>e<b/>ober</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ pedet"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>pedet</l><r><g><b/>pedet</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ prest da" r="LR"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>prest<b/>da</l><r><g><b/>prest<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ prest da" r="LR"><p><l>prest<b/></l><r/></p><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>da</l><r><g><b/>prest<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ tonket da" r="RL"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>tonket<b/><a/>da</l><r><g><b/>tonket<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ tonket da" r="LR"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>tonket<b/>d’</l><r><g><b/>tonket<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ tonket da" r="LR"><p><l>tonket<b/></l><r/></p><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>d’</l><r><g><b/>tonket<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ tu da" r="LR"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>tu<b/>da</l><r><g><b/>tu<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ tu da" r="LR"><p><l>tu<b/></l><r/></p><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>da</l><r><g><b/>tu<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ tuet da" r="RL"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>tuet<b/><a/>da</l><r><g><b/>tuet<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ tuet da" r="LR"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>tuet<b/>d’</l><r><g><b/>tuet<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bezañ tuet da" r="LR"><p><l>tuet<b/></l><r/></p><par n="/bezañ__vbloc"/><p><l><b/>d’</l><r><g><b/>tuet<b/>da</g></r></p></e>
